California, session 20252026, AB2012.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 35790 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:35790. (a) The Department of Transportation or a local authority with respect to highways under their respective jurisdiction, upon a written application by a transporter or licensed manufacturer or dealer, shall may issue a special or annual permit in writing authorizing the applicant to move a manufactured home in excess of the maximum width but not exceeding 14 feet in total width, exclusive of lights and devices provided for in Sections 35109 and 35110, upon any highway under the jurisdiction of the entity granting the permit.(b) A public agency, in the exercise of its discretion in granting a permit for the movement of an overwidth manufactured home, and in considering the individual circumstances of each case, may use merchandising or relocation of residence as a basis for movement for good cause.(c) (1) The application for a special permit shall specifically describe the manufactured home to be moved and the particular highways over which the permit to operate is requested.(2) A special permit shall not be required to move a manufactured home if the applicant has obtained an annual permit pursuant to this section.(3) The application for an annual permit shall specifically describe the power unit to be used to tow the overwidth manufactured home and the particular highways over which the permit to operate is requested. The annual permit shall be subject to all of the conditions of this section.(d) The Department of Transportation or local authority may establish seasonal or other time limitations within which a manufactured home may be moved on the highways indicated, and may require an undertaking or other security as it deems necessary to protect the highways and bridges from injury or to provide indemnity for any injury resulting from the movement of the manufactured home.(e) A permit for the movement of a manufactured home issued pursuant to this section shall not be issued except to transporters or licensed manufacturers and dealers and only under the following conditions:(1) The manufactured home for which the permit is issued shall comply with Sections 35550 and 35551.(2) In the case of a permit issued on an individual or repetitive trip basis, the applicant has first received the approval of a city or county if the trip will include movement on streets or highways under the jurisdiction of the city or county. The application for the permit shall indicate the complete route of the proposed move and shall specify all cities and counties that have approved the move. This paragraph does not require the Department of Transportation to verify the information provided by an applicant with respect to movement on streets or highways under local jurisdiction.(3) It is a violation of a permit that is issued pursuant to this section by the Department of Transportation that authorizes a move only on a state highway for that move to be extended to a street or highway under the jurisdiction of a city or county unless the move has been approved by the city or county.(f) The Department of Transportation, in cooperation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol or the local authority, may establish additional reasonable permit regulations as it may deem necessary in the interest of public safety. A regulation established pursuant to this subdivision shall be consistent with this section.(g) The permit, the consent form or forms as required by Section 18099.5 of the Health and Safety Code, and a copy of the tax clearance certificate, certificate of origin, or dealer’s notice of transfer, if the certificate or notice is required to be issued, shall be carried in the manufactured home or power unit to which it refers and shall be open to inspection by any peace officer or traffic officer, any authorized agent of the Department of Transportation, or any other officer or employee charged with the care and protection of the highways.(h) It is unlawful for a person to violate any of the terms or conditions of a permit issued pursuant to this section.(i) For the purposes of this section, “manufactured home” includes components or modules of factory-built housing as defined in Section 19971 of the Health and Safety Code.SEC. 2.If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.